Massachusetts, session 194th, H531.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 8 of chapter 71B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the
following paragraph:-
For any parent or guardian who provides transportation to a school age child with a
disability, the school district shall reimburse the parent or guardian the prevailing rate per mile
for state employees and the state minimum wage for the time spent providing the transportation.
Reimbursement shall be for no more than the round-trip time and distance between the home and
the school for school attendance and school-sponsored extracurricular activities. Mileage shall be
determined based on a direct route between the student's home and school. No parent or guardian
shall be obligated to provide such transportation.
of 1